District of Columbia statutes.
42-2803.01

Annual report by Mayor.

No later than April 1 of each fiscal year, the Mayor shall transmit to the Council a Housing Production Trust Fund Annual Report. The report shall include the following information:

(1)

The amount of money expended from the Housing Production Trust Fund during the fiscal year;

(2)

The number of loans and grants made during the fiscal year;

(3)

The number of low-income, very low-income, and extremely low-income households and individuals assisted through Fund expenditures;

(4)

A list of each project on which funds from the Fund were expended, including, for each project:

(A)

A brief description of the project, including the name of the project sponsor;

(B)

The amount of money expended on the project;

(C)

Whether the money expended was in the form of a loan or a grant; and

(D)

The general terms of the loan or grant;

(5)

The amount and percentage of funds expended on homeownership projects;

(6)

The amount and percentage of funds expended on rental housing projects;

(7)

The amount and percentage of funds expended on rental housing or homeownership opportunities for households with incomes at or below 30% of the area median income;

(8)

The amount and percentage of funds expended on rental housing or homeownership opportunities for households with incomes at or below 50% of the area median income;

(9)

The amount and percentage of funds expended on rental housing or homeownership opportunities for households with incomes at or below 80% of the area median income;

(10)

The number of housing units assisted, including the number of rental housing units assisted and the number of homeownership units assisted; and

(11)

The amount expended on administrative costs during the fiscal year.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-202, § 4a
as added Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 501(e), 49 DCR 1468
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 2042, 58 DCR 6226
D.C. Law 19-21 substituted “No later than April 1” for “Within 60 days after the end”.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2093 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
Short title: Section 2041 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle E of title II of the act may be cited as “Affordable Housing Annual Reporting Amendment Act of 2011”.

Section 1101 of D.C. Law 14-114 provided: “The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall promulgate rules to implement this act.”

Section 2093 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided:

“Sec. 2093. Affordable housing production report.

“(a) The Mayor shall transmit to the Council an affordable housing production report that shall include the following information:

“(1) The amount of money expended by the Department of Housing and Community Development for the acquisition and production of affordable housing during the fiscal year;

“(2) The number of loans and grants made during the fiscal year;

“(3) The number of low-income, very low-income, and extremely low-income households and individuals assisted through the expenditures;

“(4) A list of each project for which funds were expended, including, for each project:

“(A) A brief description of the project, including the name of the project sponsor;

“(B) The amount of money expended on the project;

“(C) Whether the money expended was in the form of a loan or a grant; and

“(D) The general terms of the loan or grant;

“(5) The amount and percentage of funds expended on homeownership projects;

“(6) The amount and percentage of funds expended on rental housing projects;

“(7) The amount and percentage of funds expended on rental housing or homeownership opportunities for households with incomes at or below 30% of the area median income;

“(8) The amount and percentage of funds expended on rental housing or homeownership opportunities for households with incomes at or below 50% of the area median income;

“(9) The amount and percentage of funds expended on rental housing or homeownership opportunities for households with incomes at or below 80% of the area median income;

“(10) The number of housing units assisted, including the number of rental housing units assisted and the number of homeownership units assisted; and

“(11) The amount expended on administrative costs during the fiscal year.

“(b) The Mayor shall include the affordable housing production report as a subunit of the Housing Production Trust Fund Annual Report required by section 4a of the Housing Production Trust Fund Act of 1988, effective April 19, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-114: D.C. Official Code § 42-2803.01).”